Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/ky_affix.dat
SET UTF-8
TRY анелкыртиуодбмгүсжзөйшчпэКБАяюңМЭвОЖУСТц-ӨПИНДхфШьЧЫФЛГРВЕҮЮёХЗЯ
WORDCHARS -'

# кеме
SFX A Y 5
SFX A 0 нин .
SFX A 0 ге .
SFX A 0 ни .
SFX A 0 де .
SFX A 0 ден .

# аба
SFX B Y 5
SFX B 0 нын .
SFX B 0 га .
SFX B 0 ны .
SFX B 0 да .
SFX B 0 дан .

# plural forms
SFX P Y 12
SFX P 0 лар [аур]
SFX P 0 лер [еи]
SFX P 0 лор о
SFX P 0 лөр [өү]
SFX P 0	дар [^өү][мнңрйл]
SFX P 0 дер [и][лм]
SFX P 0	дор [о][бвджзг]
SFX P 0 дөр [өү][лн]
SFX P 0 тар [^ө][тк]
SFX P 0 тер [пшс]
SFX P 0 тор [о][стк]
SFX P 0 төр [ө][тк]

# numbers
SFX N Y 14
SFX N 0 инчи [ие][ршз]
SFX N 0 нчи [^ое][ин]
SFX N 0 үнчү [ү][чз] 
SFX N 0 үнчү т
SFX N 0 нчы ы
SFX N 0 унчу [у]з
SFX N 0 унчу он
SFX N 0 нчы [м]а
SFX N 0 ынчы [ы][кш]
SFX N 0 ынчы к
SFX N 0 нчү ү
SFX N 0 чи [и]н
SFX N 0 инчи [и]ң
SFX N 0 инчи [^к]н
